Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 60 COMMERCIAL FEEDING STUFFS
35-60-113. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant thereto may be subject to a civil penalty as determined by the commissioner. Such civil penalty is in addition to and not a substitution for other penalties or remedies set forth in this article.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the commissioner shall consider the severity of the violation, the amount of harm caused by such violation, and the presence or absence of a pattern of similar violations by the distributor.

The maximum civil penalty imposed by the commissioner shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars per day per violation.

Before the commissioner imposes any civil penalty, the person charged shall be provided with a notice of the violation and an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect a civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or any portion of a civil penalty, the commissioner may recover the amount of the penalty, plus costs and attorney fees, by action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

All moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article R&RE, p. 578, § 1, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2005:

(4) amended, p. 1276, § 19, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-60-112 as it existed prior to 1999.

35-60-114. Cooperation with other entities.

The commissioner may cooperate and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article R&RE, p. 579, § 1, effective January 1, 2000.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-60-113 as it existed prior to 1999.

35-60-115. Publications.

The commissioner shall publish at least annually, in such form as he or she may deem proper and in accordance with the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S., information concerning the sales of commercial feeds, together with such data on their production and use as the commissioner may consider advisable, and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feeds sold within the state as compared with the analyses on the label, but the information concerning production and use of commercial feeds shall not disclose the operations of any person.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire article R&RE, p. 579, § 1, effective January 1, 2000.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-60-114 as it existed prior to 1999.

35-60-116. Study - hemp products in animal feed - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-109), ch. 60, p. 191, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2018. (See L. 2017, p. 191.)